Florida, session 2026, HB913.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
945.215, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
945.215 Inmate welfare and employee benefit trust funds.—
(3) CONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST
FUND; CONTRACTOR-OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES.—
(b)1. The net proceeds derived from inmate canteens,
vending machines used primarily by inmates, telephone
commissions, and similar sources at contractor-operated
correctional facilities shall be deposited in the Contractor-
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb913 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 913 2026 Legislature
Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare Trust Fund.
2. Maintenance and repair deduction fees from contractor-
operated correctional facilities shall be deposited in the
Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare Trust Fund.
3. Funds in the Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate
Welfare Trust Fund shall be used exclusively to provide for or
operate any of the following at contractor-operated correctional
facilities:
a. Programs to aid inmates' reintegration into society.
b. Environmental health upgrades to facilities, including
fixed capital outlay for repairs and maintenance that would
improve environmental conditions of the correctional facilities.
4.2. Funds in the Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate
Welfare Trust Fund shall be expended only pursuant to
legislative appropriation.
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 945.215, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 944.72, Florida
Statutes, is reenacted to read:
944.72 Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare
Trust Fund.—
(1) There is hereby created in the Department of
Corrections the Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare
Trust Fund. The purpose of the trust fund shall be the benefit
and welfare of inmates incarcerated in contractor-operated
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb913 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 913 2026 Legislature
correctional facilities under contract with the department
pursuant to this chapter or chapter 957. Moneys shall be
deposited in the trust fund and expenditures made from the trust
fund as provided in s. 945.215.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb913 -03-er